Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0404

Liability of members and directors.

(1) Unless the articles of organization provide otherwise, a debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited cooperative association is solely the debt, obligation, or other liability of the association. A member or director is not personally liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the association solely by reason of being or acting as a member or director of the association. This subsection applies regardless of the dissolution of the association.

(2) The failure of a limited cooperative association to observe formalities relating to the exercise of its powers or management of its activities and affairs is not grounds for imposing liability on any member or director for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the association.

[ 2019 c 37 s 404.]